District of Columbia statutes.
5-1410

Autopsy by pathologist other than a medical examiner.

(a)

If an autopsy is performed by a pathologist other than a medical examiner by request of the CME, the pathologist shall furnish to the CME, a complete record of the findings and conclusions of the autopsy. The CME, or assigned medical examiner, shall thereupon prepare a report, indicating the name of the pathologist performing the autopsy, the pathologist’s findings and conclusions, and the CME’s, or assigned medical examiner’s, own comments, if appropriate.

(b)

A pathologist other than a medical examiner who performs an autopsy at the request of the CME shall be compensated in accordance with a fee rate established by the Mayor by regulation.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2911, 47 DCR 6308
1981 Ed., § 11-2307.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2911 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to Title XXIX of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Act of 2000” Creating the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, see Mayor’s Order 2001-04, January 5, 2001 ( 48 DCR 938).